Indiana, session 2026, HB1014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-334.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 334.5. "Sonography services", for
purposes of IC 16-41-35, has the meaning set forth in
IC 16-41-35-10.5.
SECTION 2. IC 16-41-35-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. As used in this
chapter, "radiation" means the following:
(1) Ionizing radiation, including gamma rays, x-rays, alpha
particles, beta particles, and other atomic or nuclear particles or
rays.
(2) Electromagnetic radiation generated during the operation of
electronic products.
(3) Sonic, ultrasonic, or infrasonic waves that are emitted from an
electronic product as a result of the operation of an electronic
circuit in that product that may produce a hazard to health,
including sound waves commonly used for sonography.
2026 IN 1014—LS 6128/DI 148


SECTION 3. IC 16-41-35-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. As used in this chapter,
"sonography services" refers to an imaging technique that uses
ultrasonic waves that are emitted from an electronic product to
produce images of the inside of a body.
SECTION 4. IC 16-41-35-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2014,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) Subject to subsection (b), a person may
not:
(1) produce radiation; or
(2) produce, use, store, sell, or otherwise dispose of:
(A) radiation machines; or
(B) electronic products;
unless the person registers in writing with the state department, giving
the pertinent information the state department requires, in accordance
with the procedures prescribed by the state department.
(b) A person may not provide sonography services unless the
person either:
(1) is a licensed or certified health care provider under:
(A) IC 25-22.5;
(B) IC 25-23;
(C) IC 25-23.4; or
(D) IC 25-27.5; or
(2) is providing the sonography services under the supervision
of a licensed or certified health care provider described in
subdivision (1).
(c) A person that violates subsection (b) commits a Class B
misdemeanor. Each violation constitutes a separate offense.
(d) In addition to any other penalty under this chapter, the state
department may impose a civil penalty of not more than
twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) against a person for each
violation of subsection (b).
SECTION 5. IC 35-52-16-76.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 76.8. IC 16-41-35-26 defines a
crime concerning sonography services.
2026 IN 1014—LS 6128/DI 148